Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 4. Senior Housing Office.

Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of AS

18.56.700

—

18.56.799

are derived in part from former AS 44.47.585 — 44.47.591 and former AS 44.47.595 — 44.47.609.

Administrative Code. —

For senior housing program, see 15 AAC 151, art. 5.

Collateral references. —

Zoning regulations as applied to homes or housing for the elderly. 83 ALR3d 1103.

Sec. 18.56.700.
Senior housing office.

There is established in the corporation a senior housing office. The office shall promote a comprehensive response to the needs of senior citizens for adequate, accessible, secure, and affordable housing in the state. In order to fulfill this purpose, the office may

study the needs of senior citizens in the state for housing to meet their needs;

seek financial assistance from appropriate sources for the development of housing alternatives for senior citizens;

administer the senior housing loan program established under AS

18.56.700

—

18.56.799

;

cooperate and coordinate with other public and private agencies to respond to the housing needs of senior citizens;

offer public education programs to increase the awareness of alternatives to large residential facilities for senior citizens;

provide information to senior citizens to help them understand their financial alternatives related to homes they might already own and to help them coordinate with other senior citizens in finding housing alternatives, including information and coordination on home equity conversion and home sharing; and

disseminate information to construction contractors to educate them about remodeling projects that would meet the needs of many senior citizens for accessible and secure housing.

In order to avoid duplication of efforts and to benefit from the commission’s expertise, the office shall consult with the Alaska Commission on Aging in the performance of the office’s duties under AS

18.56.700

—

18.56.799

so that the housing needs of senior citizens can be met most efficiently and effectively.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 1 ch 131 SLA 1994)

Sec. 18.56.710.
Senior housing revolving fund.

The senior housing revolving fund is established. The revolving fund consists of appropriations made to it by the legislature, the proceeds of bonds sold under AS

18.56.790

, repayments of principal and interest on loans made or purchased from assets of the fund, and money or other assets transferred to the revolving fund by the corporation. The corporation may

pledge amounts deposited in the revolving fund for bonds issued under AS

18.56.790

;

use amounts deposited in the fund for making, purchasing, or participating in

senior housing mortgage loans;

loans made for building materials for senior housing;

loans made for renovation or improvement of or for senior housing, including loans for renovation or improvement of congregate or individual residences; and

loans made for the construction of senior housing.

For each loan proposed to be made under AS

18.56.700

—

18.56.799

, the corporation shall determine the financial feasibility of the project for which the loan would be used and the extent to which the project would meet senior housing needs in the area for which it is proposed.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 2 ch 84 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and purpose provisions relating to the 1998 amendments to subsection (a), see § 1, ch. 84, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 18.56.720.
Interest rate. [Repealed, § 7 ch 84 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 18.56.730.
Conditions on loans.

The corporation shall adopt regulations under AS

18.56.088(a)

and (b) establishing acceptable security for loans originated or purchased in whole or in part under AS

18.56.700

—

18.56.799

.

The corporation

may condition a loan under AS

18.56.700

—

18.56.799

on an agreement by the borrower to maintain the financed project as senior housing for a time period specified by the corporation; and

shall establish by regulation the criteria it will use for specifying time periods under (1) of this subsection and for determining under what circumstances the time periods can be decreased after the loan is made.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For senior housing program, see 15 AAC 151, art. 5.

Sec. 18.56.740.
Fire insurance.

Before purchasing or participating in the purchase of a senior housing mortgage loan, the corporation shall require the borrower to agree to purchase and maintain fire insurance for the real property for which the loan is made in an amount not less than the outstanding principal balance of the loan.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.56.750.
Loan origination and servicing.

Before purchasing or participating in the purchase of a senior housing loan, the corporation shall enter into a loan servicing agreement with the private financial institution from which the loan is to be purchased.

The corporation may execute service agreements with private lending institutions or with regional Native housing authorities established under AS

18.55.996

to service loans originated by the office.

Under the servicing agreement, the private financial institution or the regional Native housing authority shall administer the loan and may charge the corporation a negotiated origination or servicing fee on the office’s share of the loan. When appropriate, the private financial institution or the regional Native housing authority may also charge the borrower a reasonable origination fee not to exceed one percent.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.56.760.
Appraisals.

Before originating or purchasing or participating in the purchase of a senior housing mortgage loan, the corporation may have or may require the borrower to have an appraisal made of the fair market value of the real property, including structures on the real property, for which the loan is made. In conducting an appraisal under this section, the appraiser shall give full value to insulation and other features of construction in structures on the real property that add to the energy efficiency of the structures.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.56.770.
Toll-free telephone number.

The corporation shall arrange for and maintain a toll-free telephone number for senior housing purposes so that private financial institutions and their borrowers may contact the office from any location in the state by telephone without a toll charge.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.56.780.
Contracting for services.

The corporation may contract for the services of persons who will assist the office in performing its duties under AS

18.56.700

—

18.56.799

.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.56.790.
Bonds for senior housing.

Under the procedures of this chapter, the corporation may issue bonds in a total amount not exceeding $30,000,000 to fund senior housing loans made under AS

18.56.700

—

18.56.799

.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 84 SLA 1998.]

[Repealed, § 7 ch 84 SLA 1998.]

[Repealed, § 8 ch 84 SLA 1998.]

In this section, “bond” has the meaning given in AS

18.56.390

.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am §§ 3, 7, 8 ch 84 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this section are derived in part from former AS

18.56.083

.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and purpose provisions relating to the 1998 amendment to subsection (a), see § 1, ch. 84, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 18.56.795.
Regulations.

For purposes of implementing AS

18.56.700

—

18.56.799

, the corporation shall, under AS

18.56.088

, establish by regulation the age requirement for occupants of senior housing, which may not be less than 55 years of age.

History.

(§ 4 ch 84 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and purpose provisions relating to the 1998 enactment of this section, see § 1, ch. 84, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 18.56.799.
Definitions.

In AS

18.56.700

—

18.56.799

,

“office” means the senior housing office established under AS

18.56.700

;

“senior housing”

means construction or improvement undertaken primarily to provide dwelling accommodations for older individuals, including conventional housing, housing for frail elderly, group homes, congregate housing, residential horizontal property regimes organized under AS 34.07, residential cooperatives organized under AS 10.15 or AS 34.08, residential condominiums organized under AS 34.08, and other housing that meets special needs of the elderly;

includes acquisition, construction, or rehabilitation of land, buildings, improvements, and other nonhousing facilities that are incidental or appurtenant to the housing described in (A) of this paragraph.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 5 ch 84 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and purpose provisions relating to the 1998 amendment to paragraph (2), see § 1, ch. 84, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.